Maryland, session 2025, HB0772.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *hb0772*

HOUSE BILL 772
Article – Education
5–213.
(a) Each fiscal year, the State shall distribute the State share of the foundation
program to each county board.
(b) Except as provided in subsections (c) and (d) of this section, each fiscal year,
the county board shall distribute to each school the minimum school funding amount for
the foundation program calculated under § 5–234 of this subtitle.
(c) (1) Each county board shall distribute to the local workforce development
board for the county the following amount multiplied by the enrollment count in the county:
(i) For fiscal year 2024, $62; and
(ii) For [each of fiscal years 2025 and 2026] FISCAL YEAR 2025 AND
EACH FISCAL YEAR THEREAFTER FISCAL YEARS 2025 THROUGH 2028, the prior fiscal
year amount increased by the inflation adjustment.
(2) The funds distributed under paragraph (1) of this subsection shall be
used to support the Career Counseling Program for Middle and High School Students
established under [§ 7–126] § 7–127 of this article that is provided collaboratively by the
workforce development board, the school, any other relevant State or local agencies, and
employers.
(3) On or before June 30, 2024, and [in each of the next 2 4 fiscal years]
EACH JUNE 30 THEREAFTER, the local workforce development board, in collaboration
with the county board and any other relevant State or local agencies, shall report to the
Accountability and Implementation Board established under Subtitle 4 of this title on the
use of the funds and the impact of the funds on providing career counseling.
(4) ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2027, THE ACCOUNTABILITY AND
IMPLEMENTATION BOARD SHALL REPORT TO THE GOVERNOR AND, IN
ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, THE GENERAL
ASSEMBLY ON THE EFFECTIVENESS OF THE CAREER COUNSELING PROGRAM FOR
MIDDLE AND HIGH SCHOOL STUDENTS, INCLUDING WHETHER:
(I) CAREER COUNSELING SERVICES HAVE ADEQUATELY
PREPARED STUDENTS FOR POST–COLLEGE AND CAREER READINESS PATHWAYS;
(II) STUDENTS HAVE RECEIVED HIGH–QUALITY CAREER
OPPORTUNITIES AS A RESULT OF THE PROGRAM; AND

HOUSE BILL 772 3
(III) THE PROGRAM HAS RESULTED IN STUDENTS EMBARKING
ON SATISFACTORY CAREER PATHS AFTER COMPLETING HIGH SCHOOL.
7–127.
(b) (1) There is a Career Counseling Program for Middle and High School
Students.
(2) The purpose of the Program is to provide each middle school and high
school student in the county with individualized career counseling services.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.